Hawaii statutes.
§103-7 Capital improvements; authorizations
for; emergency repairs or reconstruction, exception. All capital
improvement projects requiring the use of general funds, special funds, general
obligation bonds, and revenue bonds of the State, except projects covered by
chapter 41D shall require authorization by the legislature and the governor. [L
1961, c 75, §1; Supp, §9-5.5; am L 1967, c 272, §1; HRS §103-7; am L 1989, c
261, §4]

Attorney General Opinions

Money appropriated for specific purpose cannot be used for
another purpose. Att. Gen. Op. 70-4.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next